Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Discriminatory Practices Prohibited.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Wherever Alaska has not itself established specific guidelines or rules to implement this article, it is appropriate to follow federal guidelines. June 8, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

15 Am. Jur. 2d, Civil Rights, § 1 et seq.

14 C.J.S., Civil Rights, §§ 12 et seq., 31 et seq., 76 et seq.

Exclusion of person (for reason other than color or race) from place of public entertainment or amusement. 1 ALR2d 1165.

Racial segregation. 38 ALR2d 1188.

What businesses or establishments fall within state civil rights statute provisions prohibiting discrimination. 87 ALR2d 120.

Power of municipal corporation to enact civil rights ordinance.
93 ALR2d 1028.

Validity and effect of gift or charitable purposes which excludes otherwise qualified beneficiaries because of their race or religion. 25 ALR3d 736.

Actionability under state statutes of discrimination because of complaining party’s association with persons of different race, color, or the like. 35 ALR3d 859.

Racial discrimination in punishment for crime. 40 ALR3d 227.

Application of state law to sex discrimination in sports. 66 ALR3d 1262.

Recovery of damages as remedy for wrongful discrimination under state or local civil rights provisions.
85 ALR3d 351.

Statute expressly allowing alimony to wife, but not expressly allowing alimony to husband, as unconstitutional sex discrimination. 85 ALR3d 940.

Construction and application of state equal rights amendments forbidding determination of rights based on sex. 90 ALR3d 158.

Constitutionality of rape laws limited to protection of females only. 99 ALR3d 129.

Constitutionality of assault and battery laws limited to protection of females only or which provide greater penalties for males than for females. 5 ALR4th 708.

Propriety of automobile insurer’s policy of refusing insurance, or requiring advance rates, because of age, sex, residence, or handicap. 33 ALR4th 523.

Availability and scope of punitive damages under state employment discrimination law. 81 ALR5th 367.

Compensatory damages recoverable under state law actions for employer's sexual harassment or discrimination. 14 ALR6th 417.

Sec. 18.80.200.
Purpose.

It is determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding that discrimination against an inhabitant of the state because of race, religion, color, national origin, age, sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, or parenthood is a matter of public concern and that this discrimination not only threatens the rights and privileges of the inhabitants of the state but also menaces the institutions of the state and threatens peace, order, health, safety, and general welfare of the state and its inhabitants.

Therefore, it is the policy of the state and the purpose of this chapter to eliminate and prevent discrimination in employment, in credit and financing practices, in places of public accommodation, in the sale, lease, or rental of real property because of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy or parenthood. It is also the policy of the state to encourage and enable physically and mentally disabled persons to participate fully in the social and economic life of the state and to engage in remunerative employment. It is not the purpose of this chapter to supersede laws pertaining to child labor, the age of majority, or other age restrictions or requirements.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to prohibit a private employer from granting an employment preference to a member of the national guard or a veteran when hiring an employee. In this subsection,

“member of the national guard” means a person presently serving as a member in good standing in the national guard;

“veteran” means a person who was discharged under honorable conditions from service in

the armed forces of the United States;

a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States;

the Alaska Territorial Guard;

the Alaska Army National Guard;

the Alaska Air National Guard; or

the Alaska Naval Militia.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 7 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 7 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 27, 2018, added (c).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Implementation by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities of a provision in contracts to assess liquidated damages against a contractor who breaches a requirement to utilize minority or women business enterprises in subcontracting is lawful.
June 8, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.80.210.
Civil rights.

The opportunity to obtain employment, credit and financing, public accommodations, housing accommodations, and other property without discrimination because of sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, or national origin is a civil right.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 8 ch 69 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.80.215.
Activities in aid of housing for minority groups.

The activities of a nonprofit and noncommercial organization on a nonremunerative basis in aiding minority group members to obtain housing opportunities so as to further the purpose of this chapter are not considered a violation of AS

08.88.161

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 119 SLA 1969)

Sec. 18.80.220.
Unlawful employment practices; exception.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, it is unlawful for

an employer to refuse employment to a person, or to bar a person from employment, or to discriminate against a person in compensation or in a term, condition, or privilege of employment because of the person’s race, religion, color, or national origin, or because of the person’s age, physical or mental disability, sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, or parenthood when the reasonable demands of the position do not require distinction on the basis of age, physical or mental disability, sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, or parenthood;

a labor organization, because of a person’s sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, age, race, religion, physical or mental disability, color, or national origin, to exclude or to expel a person from its membership, or to discriminate in any way against one of its members or an employer or an employee;

an employer or employment agency to print or circulate or cause to be printed or circulated a statement, advertisement, or publication, or to use a form of application for employment or to make an inquiry in connection with prospective employment, that expresses, directly or indirectly, a limitation, specification, or discrimination as to sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, age, race, creed, color, or national origin, or an intent to make the limitation, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification;

an employer, labor organization, or employment agency to discharge, expel, or otherwise discriminate against a person because the person has opposed any practices forbidden under AS

18.80.200

—

18.80.280

or because the person has filed a complaint, testified, or assisted in a proceeding under this chapter;

an employer to discriminate in the payment of wages as between the sexes, or to employ a female in an occupation in this state at a salary or wage rate less than that paid to a male employee for work of comparable character or work in the same operation, business, or type of work in the same locality; or

a person to print, publish, broadcast, or otherwise circulate a statement, inquiry, or advertisement in connection with prospective employment that expresses directly a limitation, specification, or discrimination as to sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, age, race, religion, color, or national origin, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification.

The state, employers, labor organizations, and employment agencies shall maintain records on age, sex, and race that are required to administer the civil rights laws and regulations. These records are confidential and available only to federal and state personnel legally charged with administering civil rights laws and regulations. However, statistical information compiled from records on age, sex, and race shall be made available to the general public.

Notwithstanding the prohibition against employment discrimination on the basis of marital status or parenthood under (a) of this section,

an employer may, without violating this chapter, provide greater health and retirement benefits to employees who have a spouse or dependent children than are provided to other employees;

a labor organization may, without violating this chapter, negotiate greater health and retirement benefits for employees of an employer who have a spouse or dependent children than are provided to other employees of the employer.

In this section, “dependent child” means an unmarried child, including an adopted child, who is dependent upon a parent for support and who is either

less than 19 years old;

less than 23 years old and registered at and attending on a full-time basis an accredited educational or technical institution recognized by the Department of Education and Early Development; or

of any age and totally and permanently disabled.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 4 ch 119 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 237 SLA 1970; am §§ 5, 6 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 1974; am § 9 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 9 ch 69 SLA 1987; am §§ 1, 2 ch 16 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in this section in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For original jurisdiction of the superior court over suits arising under this chapter, see AS

22.10.020

.

Administrative Code. —

For reports and recordkeeping, see 6?AAC 30, art. 8.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Because discrimination on the basis of citizenship has the effect of discriminating on the basis of national origin, this section and AS

18.80.255

make it clear that an employer, including the state or any of its political subdivisions, may not discriminate against a potential or existing employee because that person is not a citizen of the United States. April 14, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Subsection (b) should be interpreted to require the commission to keep confidential information from a survey for records maintained to administer civil rights laws and regulations until it is presented at public hearing unless the information is released in a format which does not identify individual responding employers or unions.
May 14, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

It is the opinion of the attorney general that State Deferred Compensation Plan options calculated by gender-based actuarial tables unlawfully discriminate against women employees.
June 2, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

An employment decision not to hire one who lives with a person of the opposite sex does not come within the prohibition against employment decisions based on marital status.
January 4, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

Subsection (a) preserves the nonassociational rights of those public employees whose sincere and conscientious beliefs forbid union membership but who, because they are not members of an organized religion, do not come within the coverage of AS

23.40.225

.
January 13, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

A state employee in a collective bargaining unit who does not belong to an organized religion is entitled to an accommodation of his religious opposition to the payment of union dues.
January 13, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.80.230.
Unlawful practices in places of public accommodation.

It is unlawful for the owner, lessee, manager, agent, or employee of a public accommodation

to refuse, withhold from, or deny to a person any of its services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges because of sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, or national origin;

to publish, circulate, issue, display, post, or mail a written or printed communication, notice, or advertisement that states or implies

that any of the services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges of the public accommodation will be refused, withheld from, or denied to a person of a certain race, religion, sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, color, or national origin or because of pregnancy, parenthood, or a change in marital status, or

that the patronage of a person belonging to a particular race, creed, sex, marital status, color, or national origin or who, because of pregnancy, parenthood, physical or mental disability, or a change in marital status, is unwelcome, not desired, or solicited.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a physical fitness facility may limit public accommodation to only males or only females to protect the privacy interests of its users. Public accommodation may be limited under this subsection only to those rooms in the facility that are primarily used for weight loss, aerobic, and other exercises, or for resistance weight training. Public accommodation may not be limited under this subsection to rooms in the facility primarily used for other purposes, including conference rooms, dining rooms, and premises licensed under AS 04.11. This subsection does not apply to swimming pools or golf courses.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2000)

Sec. 18.80.230.
Unlawful practices in places of public accommodation.

It is unlawful for the owner, lessee, manager, agent, or employee of a public accommodation

to refuse, withhold from, or deny to a person any of its services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges because of sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, or national origin;

to publish, circulate, issue, display, post, or mail a written or printed communication, notice, or advertisement that states or implies

that any of the services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges of the public accommodation will be refused, withheld from, or denied to a person of a certain race, religion, sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, color, or national origin or because of pregnancy, parenthood, or a change in marital status, or

that the patronage of a person belonging to a particular race, creed, sex, marital status, color, or national origin or who, because of pregnancy, parenthood, physical or mental disability, or a change in marital status, is unwelcome, not desired, or solicited.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a physical fitness facility may limit public accommodation to only males or only females to protect the privacy interests of its users. Public accommodation may be limited under this subsection only to those rooms in the facility that are primarily used for weight loss, aerobic, and other exercises, or for resistance weight training. Public accommodation may not be limited under this subsection to rooms in the facility primarily used for other purposes, including conference rooms, dining rooms, and premises licensed under AS 04.09. This subsection does not apply to swimming pools or golf courses.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 7 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2000; am § 159 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 18.80.240.
Unlawful practices in the sale or rental of real property.

It is unlawful for the owner, lessee, manager, or other person having the right to sell, lease, or rent real property

to refuse to sell, lease, or rent the real property to a person because of sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, race, religion, physical or mental disability, color, or national origin; however, nothing in this paragraph prohibits the sale, lease, or rental of classes of real property commonly known as housing for “singles” or “married couples” only;

to discriminate against a person because of sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, race, religion, physical or mental disability, color, or national origin in a term, condition, or privilege relating to the use, sale, lease, or rental of real property; however, nothing in this paragraph prohibits the sale, lease, or rental of classes of real property commonly known as housing for “singles” or “married couples” only;

to make a written or oral inquiry or record of the sex, marital status, changes in marital status, race, religion, physical or mental disability, color, or national origin of a person seeking to buy, lease, or rent real property;

to offer, solicit, accept, use, or retain a listing of real property with the understanding that a person may be discriminated against in a real estate transaction or in the furnishing of facilities or sources in connection therewith because of a person’s sex, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, race, religion, physical or mental disability, color, national origin, or age;

to represent to a person that real property is not available for inspection, sale, rental, or lease when in fact it is so available, or to refuse to allow a person to inspect real property because of the race, religion, physical or mental disability, color, national origin, age, sex, marital status, change in marital status, or pregnancy of that person or of any person associated with that person;

to engage in blockbusting;

to make, print, or publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published, any notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of real property that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, physical or mental disability, sex, or national origin, or an intention to make the preference, limitation, or discrimination.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 8 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 11 ch 69 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.80.250.
Unlawful financing practice.

It is unlawful for a financial institution or other commercial institution extending secured or unsecured credit, upon receiving an application for financial assistance or credit for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair, or maintenance of a housing accommodation or other property or services, or the acquisition or improvement of unimproved property, or upon receiving an application for any sort of loan of money, to permit one of its officials or employees during the execution of the official’s or the employee’s duties

to discriminate against the applicant because of sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, or national origin in a term, condition, or privilege relating to the obtainment or use of the institution’s financial assistance or credit, except to the extent of a federal statute or regulation applicable to a transaction of the same character;

to make or cause to be made a written or oral inquiry or record of the sex, physical or mental disability, marital status, changes in marital status, pregnancy, parenthood, race, religion, color, or national origin of a person seeking the institution’s financial assistance or credit, unless the inquiry is for the purpose of ascertaining the creditor’s rights and remedies applicable to the particular extension of credit and is not made or used in order to discriminate in a determination of creditworthiness;

to refuse to extend credit, issue a credit card, or make a loan to a married person or a person with a physical or mental disability, who is otherwise creditworthy, if so requested by the person;

to refuse to issue a credit card to a married person in that person’s name, if so requested by the person, provided, however, that the person so requesting a card may be required to open an account in that name.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section, any practice permitted by federal statute or regulation applicable to financial or credit transactions of the same character as those covered by this section does not constitute discrimination under this section.

An action by a financial institution or other commercial institution extending credit taken in compliance with (a) of this section, including the extension of credit or the making of a loan, is not a violation of AS

06.20.240

, unless done with the intent or purpose of obtaining a higher rate of interest than would otherwise be permitted by AS

06.20.230

.

This section does not prohibit an institution described in (a) of this section from refusing to contract with a person if the person lacks the legal capacity to contract or if the institution is reasonably in doubt about the person’s legal capacity to contract.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 9 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 12 ch 104 SLA 1975; am §§ 12, 13 ch 69 SLA 1987)

Sec. 18.80.255.
Unlawful practices by the state or its political subdivisions.

It is unlawful for the state or any of its political subdivisions

to refuse, withhold from, or deny to a person any local, state, or federal funds, services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges because of race, religion, sex, color, or national origin;

to publish, circulate, issue, display, post, or mail a written or printed communication, notice, or advertisement that states or implies that any local, state, or federal funds, services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges of the office or agency will be refused, withheld from, or denied to a physically or mentally disabled person or a person of a certain race, religion, sex, color, or national origin or that the patronage of a physically or mentally disabled person or a person belonging to a particular race, creed, sex, color, or national origin is unwelcome, not desired, or solicited; it is not unlawful to post notice that facilities to accommodate the physically or mentally disabled are not available;

to refuse or deny to a person any local, state, or federal funds, services, goods, facilities, advantages, or privileges because of physical or mental disability.

History.

(§ 1 ch 79 SLA 1966; am § 10 ch 42 SLA 1972; am § 14 ch 69 SLA 1987)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Because discrimination on the basis of citizenship has the effect of discrimination on the basis of national origin, AS

18.80.220

and this section make it clear that an employer, including the state or any of its political subdivisions, may not discriminate against a potential or existing employee because that person is not a citizen of the United States. April 14, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

All questions on employment applications which inquire as to alienage or United States citizenship must be affirmatively stricken as legally impermissible questions; furthermore, should this information become available through a source other than by application, no use may be made of it.
April 14, 1975 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 18.80.260.
Aiding, abetting, or coercing a violation of chapter.

It is unlawful for a person to aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the doing of an act forbidden under this chapter or to attempt to do so.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965)

Sec. 18.80.270.
Penalty.

A person, employer, labor organization, or employment agency, who or that wilfully engages in an unlawful discriminatory practice prohibited by this chapter, or wilfully resists, prevents, impedes, or interferes with the commission or any of its authorized representatives in the performance of duty under this chapter, or who or that wilfully violates an order of the commission, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment in a jail for not more than 30 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am § 11 ch 63 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 14, ch. 63, SLA 2006, provides that the 2006 amendment of this section applies “to all complaints filed on or after September 13, 2006.”

Sec. 18.80.280.
Acquittal bars other actions.

The acquittal of a person by the commission or a court of competent jurisdiction of any alleged violation of this chapter is a bar to any other action, civil or criminal, based on the same act or omission.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965)

Sec. 18.80.290.
Local human rights commissions.

The legislative body of a municipality may, by ordinance or resolution, authorize the establishment of membership in and support of a local human rights commission. The number and qualifications of the members of a local commission and their terms and method of appointment or removal shall be as determined by the legislative body, except that a member may not hold office in a political party.

The legislative body of a municipality has the authority to appropriate funds in amounts as considered necessary for the purpose of contributing to the operation of a local commission, including the payment of its share of the salary of an investigator or staff member acting jointly for it and one or more other local commissions.

The local commission has the power to appoint employees and staff as it considers necessary to fulfill its purpose, including the power to appoint an investigator or staff member to act jointly for it and one or more other local commissions.

The governing body of a municipality has the authority under AS

29.20.320

to grant to local commissions powers and duties similar to those exercised by the commission under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 15 ch 104 SLA 1975; am § 44 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 18.80.295.
Apprenticeship programs.

The provisions of this chapter affecting discrimination in employment on the basis of age do not apply to apprenticeship programs registered by the Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training, United States Department of Labor, or apprenticeship programs that meet standards equivalent to apprenticeship programs registered by the Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training.

History.

(§ 1 ch 122 SLA 1976)